Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB631.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. (1) For the 2025-2026 school year, a school district may revise its
school calendar under the requirements of this section.
(2) For purposes of this section, notwithstanding the requirement in KRS 158.070
that the student instructional year not be less than 170 student attendance days and any
other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, students shall receive a
minimum of 1,062 instructional hours, less any waiver of instructional time provided in
accordance with KRS 158.070(3)(e) and 702 KAR 7:140.
(3) The commissioner of education shall grant up to the equivalent of ten (10)
disaster relief student attendance days for school districts to provide instruction using
alternative settings when the school district is closed for health or safety reasons in
addition to the ten (10) student attendance days provided under KRS 158.070(8).
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 158.070(4)(b), a school district may reach the required
instructional hours required by adding time to student attendance days. A day shall not
exceed seven hours of instructional time unless the district submitted and received
approval from the commissioner of education for an innovative alternative calendar.
(5) If a local board of education seeks to revise its school calendar under this
section, the board shall submit a plan for approval to the Kentucky Department of
Education demonstrating how the required instructional hours will be completed.
(6) Notwithstanding any other statute, administrative regulation, or local board of
education policy to the contrary, each classified and certified employee of a local board
of education shall be considered to have completed one day of his or her employment
contract for each day made up in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
Section 2. Whereas support and relief for school districts and the students
enrolled therein is imperative, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2026 1:44 PM Jacketed